California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) The insurer shall notify the policyholder of the availability of the new benefits or benefit eligibility or new policy within 12 months of the date that the new policy series is made available for sale in this state. The insurer shall file the notice with the department at the same time as the new policy or rider.

(2) The insurer shall offer the
 policyholder new benefits or benefit eligibility in one of the following ways:

(A) By adding a rider to the existing policy and paying a separate premium for the new benefits or benefit eligibility based on the insured’s attained age. The premium for the existing policy shall remain unchanged based on the insured’s age at issuance.

(B) By replacing the existing policy or certificate in accordance with Section 10234.87.

(C) By replacing the existing policy or certificate with a new policy or certificate, in which case consideration for past insured status shall be recognized by setting the premium for the replacement policy or certificate at the issue age of the policy or certificate being replaced.

(b) The insured may be required to undergo new
 underwriting, but the underwriting can be no more restrictive than if the policyholder or certificate holder were applying for a new policy or certificate.

(c) The insurer of a group policy as defined under subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 10231.6 shall offer the group policyholder the opportunity to have coverage for the new benefits and provisions extended to existing certificate holders, but the insurer is relieved of the obligations imposed by this section if the holder of the group policy declines the issuer’s offer.

(d) For purposes of this section, new benefits means coverage for new long-term care services or providers that are material in nature. New benefits that are material in nature do not include changes to policy structure, benefits, or provisions that are minor in nature. Changes that are minor in nature include, but are not limited to, changes in
 elimination periods, benefit periods, and benefit amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 140.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.91.

In the event a non-medicaid national or state long-term care program is created through public funding that substantially duplicates benefits covered by the policy or certificate, the policyholder or certificate holder will be entitled to select either a reduction in future premiums or an increase in future benefits. An actuarial method for determining the premium reductions and increases in future benefits will be mutually agreed upon by the department and insurers. The amount of the premium reductions and future benefit increases to be made by each insurer will
 be based on the extent of the duplication of covered benefits, the amount of past premium payments, and claims experience. Each insurer’s premium reduction and benefit increase plans shall be filed and approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 699, Sec. 18.   Effective October 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.94.

Every policy or certificate shall include a provision giving the policyholder or certificate holder the right to appeal decisions regarding benefit eligibility, care plans, services and providers, and reimbursement payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.95.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10235, this section applies to all long-term care policies in force, regardless of their dates of issuance.

(b) Interest shall accrue and shall be payable to the claimant at the rate of 10 percent per annum on the amount of any accepted claim beginning on the first calendar day after the day that the payment of the accepted claim is due pursuant to Section 2695.7 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations or any successor to that provision,
 provided that the claim is accepted on or after December 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.

Every individual and group long-term care policy and certificate under a group long-term care policy shall be either guaranteed renewable or noncancelable.

(a) “Guaranteed renewable” means that the insured has the right to continue coverage in force if premiums are timely paid during which period the insurer may not unilaterally change the terms of coverage or decline to renew, except that the insurer may, in accordance with provisions in the policy, and in accordance with Section 10236.1, change
 the premium rates to all insureds in the same class. The “class” is determined by the insurer for the purpose of setting rates at the time the policy is issued.

(b) “Noncancelable” means the insured has the right to continue the coverage in force if premiums are timely paid during which period the insurer may not unilaterally change the terms of coverage, decline to renew, or change the premium rate.

(c) Every long-term care policy and certificate shall contain an appropriately captioned renewability provision on page one, which shall clearly describe the initial term of coverage, the conditions for renewal, and, if guaranteed renewable, a description of the class and of each circumstance under which the insurer may change the premium amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.1.

(a) Benefits under individual long-term care insurance policies issued before new premium rate schedules are approved under Section 10236.11 shall be deemed reasonable in relation to premiums if the expected loss ratio is at least 60 percent, calculated in a manner that provides for adequate reserving of the long-term care insurance risk.

(b) (1) For individual long-term care insurance policies issued before new premium rate schedules are approved under Section 10236.11, and for which rate revisions are filed on or after January 1, 2010, benefits shall be deemed reasonable in relation to the premium if the premium rate schedules have a lifetime expected loss
 ratio of at least 60 percent of the premium scale in effect on December 31, 2009, plus 70 percent of premium increases filed on or after January 1, 2010, calculated in a manner that provides for adequate reserving of the long-term care insurance risk. The lifetime expected loss ratio shall be calculated using the discount rate defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (c).

(2) However, if the premiums in any rate revision filing calculated in the manner provided in paragraph (1) produce a lifetime expected loss ratio that is less than the highest lifetime expected loss ratio for this policy form in the initial filing or that for requested premium rates in any filing made after January 1, 2013, the insurer shall reduce the premiums in the filing so that the current lifetime expected loss ratio is equal to or greater than the highest initially filed
 loss ratio or that for requested premium rates filed after January 1, 2013. In the determination of a lifetime expected loss ratio, a margin may reflect changes in the manner in which risks are shared between the insurer and a block of policies due to changes in this law effective January 1, 2013, and that margin shall not be increased unless the manner in which risks are shared between the insurer and the block of policies is changed further by law or regulation. The determination of the lifetime expected loss ratio shall be based on the actual distribution of policies in force at the time of the first filing after January 1, 2013, and not any prior assumed distribution.

(c) In evaluating the expected loss ratio, due consideration shall be given to all relevant factors, including the following:

(1) Statistical credibility of incurred claims experience and earned premiums.

(2) The period for which rates are computed to provide coverage.

(3) Experienced and projected trends.

(4) Concentration of experience within early policy duration.

(5) Expected claim fluctuation.

(6) Experience refunds, adjustments, or dividends.

(7) Renewability features.

(8) All appropriate expense factors.

(9) The discount rate used
 in the calculation of lifetime expected loss ratios. All present and accumulated values used to determine rate increases should use the maximum valuation interest rate for contract reserves. If one rate increase filing includes policy forms with different discount rates, separate projections for each discount rate should be prepared and then combined to create the total projection for the filings.

(10) Experimental nature of the coverage.

(11) Policy reserves.

(12) Mix of business by risk classification.

(13) Product features, such as long elimination periods, high deductibles, and high maximum limits.

(d) Asset investment yield rate changes may not be used to justify a rate increase unless the insurer can demonstrate that its return on investments is lower than the maximum valuation interest rate for contract reserves for those policies or the commissioner determines that a change in interest rates is justified due to changes in laws or regulations that are retroactively applicable to long-term care insurance previously sold in this state.

(e) The experience on all similar long-term care policy forms issued in this state by an insurer and its affiliates and retained within the affiliated group shall be pooled together and the combined experience shall be used as the basis for assumptions that satisfy the requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b). Those assumptions and requested rate increases may vary by policy form if
 actuarially appropriate. Similar long-term care policy forms shall be classified into one of the following benefit classifications: nursing facility and residential care facility only, home care only, or comprehensive long-term care benefits.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for rate revisions filed on or after January 1, 2010, the commissioner may approve an application for a rate revision based on less than a 70 percent loss ratio, but not less than a 60 percent loss ratio, for the portion attributable to the rate increase if an insurer can demonstrate that the rates are necessary to protect the financial condition of the insurer, including avoidance of further reductions in capital and surplus.

(g) This section applies only to long-term care insurance policies
 issued before the approval of rate schedules under Section 10236.11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 14.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.2.

Except where the provisions of a group contract provide otherwise, the provisions of subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 10236.1 shall apply to all group long-term care insurance policies issued before the approval of premium rate schedules under Section 10236.11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 627, Sec. 4.   (AB 999)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.5.

(a) Every certificate of group insurance issued or delivered in California shall provide for continuation or conversion coverage for the certificate holder if the group coverage terminates for any reason except the following reasons:

(1) The termination of group coverage resulted from the insured’s failure to make any required payment of premium or contribution when due.

(2) The terminating coverage is replaced not
 later than 31 days after termination by new group coverage effective on the day following the termination and the replacement coverage meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The replacement coverage provides benefits identical to, or benefits determined by the commissioner to be substantially equivalent to or in excess of, those provided by the terminating coverage.

(B) The premium for the replacement coverage is calculated on the insured’s age at the time of issue of the group certificate for the coverage which is being replaced. If the coverage being replaced has itself replaced previous group coverage, the premium for the newest replacement coverage is calculated on the insured’s age at the time the previous group certificate was issued.

(b) “Continuation coverage” means the maintenance of coverage under an
 existing group policy when that coverage would be or has been terminated and which is subject only to continued timely payment of the premium.

Any insured individual whose eligibility for group coverage is based on his or her relationship to another person, shall be entitled to continuation coverage under the group policy if the qualifying relationship terminates by dissolution of marriage or death.

(c) “Conversion coverage” means an individual policy of long-term care insurance, issued by the insurer of the terminating group coverage, without considering insurability, containing benefits which are identical, or which have been determined by the commissioner to be at least substantially equivalent, to the group coverage which would be or has been terminated for any reason.

In determining whether benefits are substantially equivalent, the commissioner shall
 consider, if applicable, the relative advantages of managed care plans which use restricted provider networks, considering items such as service availability, benefit levels, and administrative complexity.

The premium for the converted policy shall be calculated on the insured’s age at the time the group certificate was issued. If the terminating group coverage replaced previous group coverage, the premium for the converted policy shall be calculated on the insured’s age at the time the previous group certificate was issued.

Before issuing conversion coverage, the insurer may require, if adequate notice is provided to certificate holders in the certificate, that:

(1) The individual must have been continuously insured under the group policy, or any group policy which it replaced, for at least six months immediately prior to termination in order to be entitled
 to conversion coverage.

(2) The insured must submit written application for a conversion policy within a reasonable period after termination of the group coverage, and the premium paid as directed by the insurer, in order that the conversion policy be issued effective on the day following termination of group coverage.

(3) The conversion policy contains a provision for a reduction of benefits if the insured has existing long-term care insurance, payable on an expense-incurred basis, which, together with the conversion policy, would result in payment of more than 100 percent of incurred expenses. This provision shall not be included in the conversion policy unless the reduction in benefits is reflected in a premium decrease or refund.

(4) The conversion policy contains a provision limiting the payment for a single
 claim, spell of illness, or benefit period occurring at the time of conversion, to the amount that would have been payable had the group coverage remained in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.8.

If a group long-term care policy is replaced by another policy to the same master policyholder issued, the replacing insurer shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide benefits identical to the terminating coverage or benefits determined by the commissioner to be at least substantially equivalent to the terminating coverage. Lesser or greater benefits may be provided if the commissioner determines the replacement coverage is the most advantageous choice for the beneficiaries.

(b) Calculate the premium on the insured’s age at the time of issue of the group certificate for the coverage which is being replaced. If the coverage being replaced has itself replaced previous group coverage, the premium for the newest replacement coverage shall be calculated on the insured’s age at the time the previous group certificate was issued. If the replacement coverage adds new or increased benefits, the premium for the new or increased benefits may be calculated on the insured’s age at the time of replacement.

(c) Offer coverage to all persons covered under the replaced group policy on its date of termination.

(d) Not exclude coverage for preexisting conditions if the terminating group coverage would provide benefits for those preexisting conditions.

(e) Not require new waiting periods, elimination periods, probationary periods, or similar preconditions related to preexisting conditions. The insurer shall waive any such time periods applicable to preexisting conditions to the extent that similar preconditions have been satisfied under the terminating group coverage.

(f) Not vary the benefits or the premium based on the insured’s health, disability status, claims experience, or use of long-term care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.11.

The premium rate schedules for all individual and group long-term care insurance policies issued in this state shall be filed with and receive the prior approval of the commissioner before the policy may be offered, sold, issued, or delivered to a resident of this state.

All initial rate filings shall be subject to the following:

(a) An approval for an initial premium schedule shall not be granted unless the actuary performing the review for the commissioner certifies that the initial premium rate schedule is sufficient to cover anticipated costs under moderately adverse experience and that the premium rate schedule is reasonably expected
 to be sustainable over the life of the form with no future premium increases anticipated. The certification may rely on supporting data in the filing. The actuary performing the review may request an actuarial demonstration that the assumptions the insurer has used are reasonable. The actuarial demonstration shall include either premium and claim experience on similar policy forms, adjusted for any premium or benefit differences, relevant and creditable data from other studies, or both.

(b) The insurer shall submit to the commissioner for approval a rate filing for each policy form that includes at least all of the following information:

(1) An actuarial memorandum that describes the assumptions the insurer used to develop the premium rate schedule. The actuarial assumptions
 shall include, but not be limited to, a sufficiently detailed description of morbidity assumptions, voluntary lapse rates, mortality assumptions, asset investment yield
 rates, a description of all expense components, and plan and option mix assumptions. The memorandum shall also include the expected lifetime loss ratio and projections of yearly earned premiums, incurred claims, incurred claim loss ratios, and changes in contract reserves.

(2) An actuarial certification consisting of at least all of the following:

(A) A statement that the initial premium rate schedule is sufficient to cover anticipated costs under moderately adverse experience and that the premium rate schedule is reasonably expected to be sustainable over the life of the form with no future premium increases anticipated.

(B) A statement that the policy design and coverage provided have been
 reviewed and taken into consideration.

(C) A statement that the underwriting and claims adjudication processes have been reviewed and taken into consideration.

(D) A complete description of the basis for contract reserves that are anticipated to be held under the form, to include all of the following:

(i) Sufficient detail or sample calculations provided so as to have a complete depiction of the reserve amounts to be held.

(ii) A statement that the assumptions used for reserves contain reasonable margins for adverse experience.

(iii) A statement that the net valuation premium for renewal years does not
 increase.

(iv) A statement that the difference between the gross premium and the net valuation premium for renewal years is sufficient to cover expected renewal expenses, or if that statement cannot be made, a complete description of the situations in which this does not occur and the type and level of change in the reserve assumptions that would be necessary for the difference to be sufficient. An aggregate distribution of anticipated issues may be used as long as the underlying gross premiums maintain a reasonably consistent relationship. If the gross premiums for certain age groups appear to be inconsistent with this requirement, the commissioner may request a demonstration under subdivision (a) based on a standard age distribution.

(E) A statement that the premium rate
 schedule is not less than the premium rate schedule for existing similar policy forms also available from the insurer except for reasonable differences attributable to benefits or a comparison of the premium schedules for similar policy forms that are currently available from the insurer with an explanation of the differences.

(c) Premium rate schedules and new policy forms shall be filed by January 1, 2002, for all group long-term care insurance policies that an insurer will offer, sell, issue, or deliver on or after January 1, 2003, and for all previously approved individual long-term care insurance policies that an insurer will offer, sell, issue, or deliver on or after January 1, 2003, unless the January 1, 2002, deadline is extended by the commissioner. Insurers may continue to offer and market long-term care insurance policies
 approved
 before January 1, 2002, until the earlier of (1) 90 days after approval of both the premium rate schedules and new policy forms filed pursuant to this section or (2) January 1, 2003. Insurers that have filed premium rate schedules and new policy forms by March 1, 2002, may continue to offer and market long-term care insurance policies approved before January 1, 2002, until the earlier of (1) 90 days after approval of both the premium rate schedules and new policy forms filed pursuant to this section or (2) June 30, 2003.

(d) This section shall not be construed as prohibiting an insurer from filing new group and individual policy forms, or from relieving an insurer of the obligation to file these forms, with the commissioner after January 1, 2003, if the policy form meets all the requirements of this chapter.

(e) (1) The commissioner shall not approve an initial premium rate schedule that includes scheduled rate increases based on the attained age of the insured or the duration of the policy.

(2) On and after January 1, 2021, a long-term care policy shall not be issued using a premium rate schedule that includes scheduled rate increases based on the attained age of the insured or the duration of the policy.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), this subdivision does not prohibit or impact the pricing of benefits that allow for the purchase of additional coverage if the cost of the additional coverage is based on the insured’s attained age at the time the additional coverage is
 added.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 625, Sec. 3.   (AB 1209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.12.

All actuaries used by the commissioner to review rate applications submitted by insurers pursuant to this chapter who are employees of the department shall be members of the American Academy of Actuaries, with at least five years’ relevant experience in long-term care insurance industry pricing or alternatively shall meet the professional requirements to issue a “statement of actuarial opinion” as required by subdivision (a) of
 Section 10236.13.

If the department does not have sufficient employees who are actuaries meeting the requirements of this section to perform the volume of work required by this chapter, the commissioner may contract, as necessary, with independent actuaries who shall be members of the American Academy of Actuaries with at least five years’ relevant experience in long-term care insurance industry pricing.

If the department has employees who are actuaries, and independent actuaries under contract to the department, both meeting the requirements of this section to review rate applications, an insurer may generally choose between having the rate application reviewed by either employees or independent actuaries under contract to the department. The costs and expenses of reviews by independent actuaries under contract to the department shall be charged to the insurer. However, the department shall have the discretion to require a
 review by independent actuaries.

Employees of the department who are actuaries and who are otherwise qualified to review rate applications but who do not meet the requirements of this section may assist an independent actuary under contract to the department.

If the commissioner contracts with independent actuaries for purposes of this section, the commissioner shall promulgate regulations to maintain the confidentiality of rate filings and proprietary insurer information and to avoid conflicts of interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 101, Sec. 3.   (AB 389)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.13.

No insurer may increase the premium for an individual or group long-term care insurance policy or certificate approved for sale under this chapter unless the insurer has received prior approval for the increase from the commissioner.

The insurer shall submit to the commissioner for approval all proposed premium rate schedule increases, including at least all of the following information:

(a) Certification by an actuary, who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and who meets the qualification standards of that organization, that:

(1) If the requested premium rate schedule increase is implemented
 and the underlying assumptions, which reflect moderately adverse conditions, are realized, no further premium rate schedule increases are anticipated.

(2) The premium rate filing is in compliance with the provisions of this section.

(b) An actuarial memorandum justifying the rate schedule change request that includes all of the following:

(1) Lifetime projections of earned premiums and incurred claims based on the filed premium rate schedule increase, and the method and assumptions used in determining the projected values, including reflection of any assumptions that deviate from those used for pricing other forms currently available for sale.

(A) Annual
 values for the five years preceding and the three years following the valuation date shall be provided separately.

(B) The projections shall include the development of the lifetime loss ratio. The lifetime expected loss ratio shall be calculated using the discount rate provided by subdivision (c) of Section 10236.14.

(C) For policies issued with premium rate schedules approved under Section 10236.11, the projections shall demonstrate compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 10236.14. For all other policies, the projections shall demonstrate compliance with Section 10236.1.

(D) If the commissioner determines that a premium rate increase is justified due to changes in laws or regulations that are retroactively applicable
 to long-term care insurance previously sold in this state, then:

(i) The projected experience should be limited to the increases in claims expenses attributable to the changes in law or regulations.

(ii) If the commissioner determines that potential offsets to higher claims costs may exist, the insurer shall be required to use appropriate net projected experience.

(2) Disclosure of how reserves have been incorporated in this rate increase.

(3) Disclosure of the analysis performed to determine why a rate adjustment is necessary, which pricing assumptions were not realized and why, and what other actions taken by the company have been relied on by the
 actuary.

(4) A statement that policy design, underwriting, and claims adjudication practices have been taken into consideration.

(5) A statement that asset investment yield rate changes have not been used to justify the rate increase unless the insurer can demonstrate that its return on investments is lower than the maximum valuation interest rate for contract reserves for those policies or the commissioner determines that a change in interest rates is justified due to changes in laws or regulations that are retroactively applicable to long-term care insurance previously sold in this state.

(6) If it is necessary to maintain consistent premium rates for new certificates and certificates receiving a rate increase, the insurer
 shall file composite rates reflecting projections of new certificates.

(c) A statement that renewal premium rate schedules are not greater than new business premium rate schedules except for differences attributable to benefits, unless sufficient justification is provided to the commissioner.

(d) Sufficient information for approval of the premium rate schedule increase by the commissioner.

(e) (1) The insurer, at its discretion, may request a premium rate schedule increase that is lower than the rate increase necessary to provide the certification required by subdivision (a) or a series of premium rate schedule increases with a present value of not more than the rate increase necessary to provide the
 certification required by subdivision (a). The commissioner may accept the premium rate schedule increase or series of increases without submission of the certification required by subdivision (a) if all of the following apply:

(A) In the opinion of the commissioner, accepting the lower premium rate schedule increase or increases is in the best interest of California policyholders.

(B) The actuarial memorandum discloses to the commissioner the rate increase necessary to provide the certification required by subdivision (a).

(C) The rate increase filing satisfies all other requirements of this section.

(D) The insurer discloses to policyholders affected
 by the approved increases the filed increase, the approved premium rate schedule increase or increases, and the amount and timing of any subsequent rate schedule increases included in the rate increase filing whether those subsequent rate schedule increases are approved or not approved by the commissioner.

(2) The commissioner may approve a lower requested premium rate schedule increase and may approve the initial increase or more than just the initial increase requested pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) If the amount of increase after all increases disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1), whether the increase or increases are approved or not approved by the commissioner, triggers the contingent benefit upon lapse, the commissioner shall require the administration
 by an insurer of the contingent benefit upon lapse as a condition of approval of a premium rate schedule increase that is lower than the amount necessary to provide the certification required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or with the initial increase and each subsequent increase in a series of premium rate schedule increases. The commissioner may waive this condition of approval if an insurer demonstrates that the waiver is necessary to protect the financial condition of the insurer, including avoidance of further reductions in capital and surplus.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10236.14, the loss ratio calculation shall assume future premiums are based on the total filed rate schedule increase or series of increases disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1), whether the increase or
 increases are approved or not approved by the commissioner.

(5) Premium rate schedule increases requested pursuant to paragraph (1) or approved as described in paragraph (2) shall comply with the provisions of Sections 10234.6 and 10234.95.

(f) The provisions of this section are applicable to all individual and group policies issued in this state on or after July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 15.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.14.

Approval of all premium rate schedule increases shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) (1) Premium rate schedule increases shall demonstrate that the sum of the accumulated value of incurred claims, without the inclusion of active life reserves, and the present value of future projected incurred claims, without the inclusion of active life reserves, will not be less than the sum of the following:

(A) The accumulated value of the initial earned premium times the maximum of both of the following:

(i) 58 percent.

(ii) The lifetime expected loss ratio calculated using the initial pricing assumption, actual distribution of policies issued, and the discount rate provided by subdivision (c).

(B) Eighty-five percent of the accumulated value of prior premium rate schedule increases on an earned basis.

(C) The present value of future projected initial earned premiums times the maximum of both of the following:

(i) 58 percent.

(ii) The lifetime expected loss ratio calculated using the initial pricing assumption, actual distribution of policies issued, and the discount rate provided by subdivision (c).

(D) Eighty-five percent of the present value of future projected premiums not in subparagraph (C) on an earned basis.

(2) However, if the premiums in any rate revision filing calculated in this manner produce a lifetime expected loss ratio that is less than the highest lifetime expected loss ratio for this policy form in the initial filing or that for requested premium rates in any filing made after January 1, 2013, the insurer shall reduce the premiums in the filing so that the current lifetime expected loss ratio is equal to or greater than the highest initially filed loss ratio or that for requested premium rates filed after January 1, 2013. In the determination of a lifetime expected loss ratio, the margin for moderately adverse experience shall be reflected and shall not be increased unless the manner in which risks are shared between
 the insurer and block of policies has been changed by this law or any future law or regulation. The determination of the lifetime expected loss ratio shall be based on the actual distribution of policies issued and not any assumed distribution prior to actual sales.

(b) In the event the commissioner determines that a premium rate increase is justified due to changes in laws or regulations that are retroactively applicable to long-term care insurance previously sold in this state, a premium rate schedule increase may be approved if the increase provides that 70 percent of the present value of projected additional premiums shall be returned to policyholders in benefits and the other requirements applicable to other premium rate schedule increases are met.

(c) All present and
 accumulated values used to determine rate increases should use the maximum valuation interest rate for contract reserves. If one rate increase filing includes policy forms with different discount rates, separate projections for each discount rate should be prepared and then combined to create the total projection for the filing.

(d) No request for a rate increase on any policy form approved under Section 10236.11 shall be approved by the commissioner except as follows: the experience on all similar long-term care policy forms issued in this state by the insurer and its affiliates and retained by the affiliated group that have been approved either prior to approval under, or pursuant to, Section 10236.11 shall be pooled together and the combined experience shall be used as the basis for assumptions that satisfy the requirements in
 subdivision (a). Those assumptions and requested rate increases may vary by policy form if actuarially appropriate. Similar long-term care policy forms shall be classified into one of the following benefit classifications: nursing facility and residential care facility only, home care only, or comprehensive long-term care benefits. An insurer is not precluded from filing requests for premium rate schedule increases on all of its policy forms if the combined experiences after pooling all applicable policy forms satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for applications for rate revisions filed on or after January 1, 2013, the commissioner may approve the application if an insurer demonstrates that the rates are necessary to protect the financial condition of the
 insurer, including avoidance of further reductions in capital and surplus.

(f) The provisions of this section are applicable to all individual and group policies issued in this state on or after July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 16.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.15.

Premium rate schedule increases that have been approved shall be subject to the following:

(a) For each rate increase that is implemented, the insurer shall file for approval by the commissioner updated projections, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10236.13, annually for the next three years and include a comparison of actual results to projected values. The commissioner may extend the period to greater than three years.

(b) (1) If the commissioner has determined that the actual experience following a rate increase does not adequately match the projected
 experience and that the current projections under moderately adverse conditions demonstrate that incurred claims will not exceed proportions of premiums specified in subdivision (a), the commissioner may require the insurer to implement any of the following:

(A) Premium rate schedule adjustments.

(B) Other measures to reduce the difference between the projected and actual experience.

(2) In determining whether the actual experience adequately matches the projected experience, consideration should be given to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 10236.13, if applicable.

(c) If the commissioner demonstrates, based upon credible evidence, that an
 insurer has engaged in a persistent practice of filing inadequate premium schedules, the commissioner may, in addition to any other authority of the commissioner under this chapter, and after the insurer is afforded proper notice and due process, prohibit the insurer from filing and marketing comparable coverage for a period of up to five years or from offering all other similar coverages, and may limit marketing of new applications to the products subject to recent premium rate schedule increases.

(d) This section shall not apply to life insurance policies and certificates that accelerate benefits for long-term care.

(e) The provisions of this section are applicable to all individual and group policies issued in this state on or after July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 17.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Inflation Escalator and Benefit Increases [10237. - 10237.6.]

10237.

This article applies to all long-term care insurance policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.1.
